California, session 20252026, AB1006.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26150 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26150. (a) If a person applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the sheriff of a county shall issue or renew a license to that person upon proof of all of the following:(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age, as defined in Section 16400.(3) The applicant is a resident of the county or a city within the county, or the applicant’s principal place of employment or business is in the county or a city within the county and the applicant spends a substantial period of time in that place of employment or business. Prima facie evidence of residency within the county or a city within the county includes, but is not limited to, the address where the applicant is registered to vote, the applicant’s filing of a homeowner’s property tax exemption, and other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the county or a city within the county is more than temporary or transient. The presumption of residency in the county or city within the county may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s primary residence is in another county or city within the county.(4) The applicant has completed a course of training as described in Section 26165.(5) The applicant is the recorded owner, with the Department of Justice, of the pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the license will be issued, or the spouse of the recorded owner.(b) The sheriff shall issue or renew a license under subdivision (a) in either of the following formats:(1) A license to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.(2) Where the population of the county is less than 200,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, a license to carry loaded and exposed in only that county a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.(c) (1) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the sheriff of the county from entering into an agreement with the chief or other head of a municipal police department of a city to process all applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, or amendments to licenses pursuant to this chapter, in lieu of the sheriff.(2) This subdivision shall only apply to applicants who reside within the city in which the chief or other head of the municipal police department has agreed to process applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, and amendments to licenses, pursuant to this chapter.SEC. 2. Section 26155 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26155. (a) When a person applies for a new license or license renewal to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person, the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city or city and county shall issue or renew a license to that person upon proof of all of the following:(1) The applicant is not a disqualified person to receive such a license, as determined in accordance with the standards set forth in Section 26202.(2) The applicant is at least 21 years of age, and presents clear evidence of the person’s identity and age, as defined in Section 16400.(3) The applicant is a resident of that city or city and county. Prima facie evidence of residency within the county or a city within the county includes, but is not limited to, the address where the applicant is registered to vote, the applicant’s filing of a homeowner’s property tax exemption, and other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the county or a city within the county is more than temporary or transient. The presumption of residency in the county or city within the county may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the applicant’s primary residence is in another county or city within the county.(4) The applicant has completed a course of training as described in Section 26165.(5) The applicant is the recorded owner, with the Department of Justice, of the pistol, revolver, or other firearm for which the license will be issued, or the spouse of the recorded owner.(b) The chief or other head of a municipal police department shall issue or renew a license under subdivision (a) in either of the following formats:(1) A license to carry concealed a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.(2) Where the population of the county in which the city is located is less than 200,000 persons according to the most recent federal decennial census, a license to carry loaded and exposed in only that county a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.(c) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the chief or other head of a municipal police department of any city from entering an agreement with the sheriff of the county in which the city is located for the sheriff to process all applications for licenses, renewals of licenses, and amendments to licenses, pursuant to this chapter.SEC. 3. Section 26162 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26162. (a) Prior to the issuance of a license, renewal of a license, or amendment to a license, each licensing authority with direct access to the designated Department of Justice system shall determine if the applicant is the recorded owner or the spouse of the recorded owner of the particular pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person reported in the application for a license or the application for the amendment to a license under this chapter.(b) An agency with direct access to the designated Department of Justice system shall confirm the applicant’s information with firearm ownership maintained in the system. An agency without access to the system shall confirm this information with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located.SEC. 4. Section 26200 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26200. (a) While carrying a firearm as authorized by a license issued pursuant to this chapter, a licensee shall not do any of the following:(1) Consume an alcoholic beverage or controlled substance as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.(2) Be in a place having a primary purpose of dispensing alcoholic beverages for onsite consumption.(3) Be under the influence of any alcoholic beverage, medication, or controlled substance as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.(4) Carry a firearm not listed on the license or a firearm for which they are not the recorded owner or the spouse of the recorded owner. This paragraph does not apply to a licensee who was issued a license pursuant to Section 26170, in which case they may carry a firearm that is registered to the agency for which the licensee has been deputized or appointed to serve as a peace officer, and the licensee carries the firearm consistent with that agency’s policies.(5) Falsely represent to a person that the licensee is a peace officer.(6) Engage in an unjustified display of a deadly weapon.(7) Fail to carry the license on their person.(8) Impede a peace officer in the conduct of their activities.(9) Refuse to display the license or to provide the firearm to a peace officer upon demand for purposes of inspecting the firearm.(10) Violate any federal, state, or local criminal law.(b) In addition to the restrictions and conditions listed in subdivision (a), a license issued pursuant to this chapter may also include any reasonable restrictions or conditions that the licensing authority deems warranted, including restrictions as to the time, place, manner, and circumstances under which a licensee may carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.(c) Any restrictions imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be indicated on any license issued.(d) A licensee authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to this chapter shall not carry more than two firearms under the licensee’s control at one time.SEC. 5. Section 26202 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26202. (a) Unless a court makes a contrary determination pursuant to Section 26206, an applicant shall be deemed to be a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 if the applicant:(1) Is reasonably likely to be a danger to self, others, or the community at large, as demonstrated by anything in the application for a license or through the investigation described in subdivision (b), or as shown by the results of any psychological assessment, including, but not limited to, the assessment described in subdivision (e) of Section 26190.(2) Has been convicted of contempt of court under Section 166.(3) Has been subject to any restraining order, protective order, or other type of court order issued pursuant to the following statutory provisions, unless that order expired, was dismissed, or was vacated or otherwise canceled more than five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application:(A) Section 646.91 or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) of Division 10 of the Family Code.(B) Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code.(C) Sections 136.2 and 18100.(D) Section 527.6, 527.8, or 527.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(E) Section 213.5, 304, 362.4, 726.5, or 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been convicted of an offense listed in Section 422.6, 422.7, 422.75, or 29805.(5) Has engaged in an unlawful or reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm.(6) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been charged with any offense listed in Section 290, 667.5, 1192.7, 1192.8, or 29805 that was dismissed pursuant to a plea or dismissed with a waiver pursuant to People v. Harvey (1979) 25 Cal.3d 754.(7) In the five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been committed to or incarcerated in county jail or state prison for, or on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision as a result of, a conviction of an offense, an element of which involves controlled substances, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol.(8) Is currently abusing controlled substances, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol.(9) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has experienced the loss or theft of multiple firearms due to the applicant’s lack of compliance with federal, state, or local law regarding storing, transporting, or securing the firearm. For purposes of this paragraph, “multiple firearms” includes a loss of more than one firearm on the same occasion, or the loss of a single firearm on more than one occasion.(10) Failed to report a loss of a firearm as required by Section 25250 or any other state, federal, or local law requiring the reporting of the loss of a firearm.(11) Provided any information that the applicant knew or should have known was inaccurate or incomplete information in connection with an application for a new license or a license renewal.(12) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been charged with convicted of an offense listed in Section 71, 76, 422, or 626.8.(13) Is a validated gang member.(14) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been convicted of an offense that does not preclude the person’s lawful possession of a firearm but is an offense involving violence against a person, a crime of moral turpitude, an offense that could be charged as a felony or misdemeanor that is adjudicated as a misdemeanor, or an offense charged as a felony that is adjudicated as a misdemeanor. person.(b) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a) of this section, the licensing authority shall conduct an investigation that meets all of the following minimum requirements:(1) An in-person interview with the applicant. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.(2) In-person, virtual, or telephonic interviews with at least three character references, at least one of whom must be a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 273.5, if applicable, and at least one of whom must be the applicant’s cohabitant, if applicable. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.(3) A review of publicly available information about the applicant, including publicly available statements published or posted by the applicant.(4) A review of all information provided in the application for a license.(5) A review of all information provided by the Department of Justice in accordance with subdivision (a) of, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 26185, as well as firearms eligibility notices or any other information subsequently provided to the licensing authority regarding the applicant.(6) A review of the information in the California Restraining and Protective Order System accessible through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System.(c) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a), nothing in this section precludes the licensing authority from engaging in investigative efforts in addition to those listed in subdivision (b).(d) Within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority shall give written notice to the applicant of the licensing authority’s initial determination, based on its investigation thus far, of whether an applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 as follows:(1) If the licensing authority makes an initial determination that, based on its investigation thus far, the applicant is not a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant to proceed with the training requirements specified in Section 26165. The licensing authority shall then submit the applicant’s fingerprints or the renewal notification to the Department of Justice in accordance with Section 26185.(2) If, within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority determines that the applicant is a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant that the request for a license has been denied, state the reason as to why the determination was made, and inform the applicant that they may request a hearing from a court, as outlined in Section 26206. A licensing authority providing notice under this paragraph informing the applicant that the request for a license has been denied satisfies the requirement to provide notice of a denial of a license pursuant to Section 26205.(e) The prohibitions listed in subdivision (a) shall apply whether or not the relevant conduct, order, conviction, charge, commitment, or other relevant action took place or was issued or entered before the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.SEC. 6.Section 26220 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26220.(a)Except as otherwise provided in this section and in subdivision (c) of Section 26210, a license issued on or after January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license.(b)If the licensee’s place of employment or business was the basis for issuance of a license pursuant to Section 26150, the license is valid for any period of time not to exceed 90 days from the date of the license, unless the license was issued pursuant to subdivision (d). The license shall be valid only in the county in which the license was originally issued. The licensee shall give a copy of this license to the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county in which the licensee resides. The licensing authority that originally issued the license shall inform the licensee verbally and in writing in at least 16-point type of this obligation to give a copy of the license to the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county of residence. Any application to renew or extend the validity of, or reissue, the license may be granted only upon the concurrence of the licensing authority that originally issued the license and the licensing authority of the city, county, or city and county in which the licensee resides.(c)A license issued pursuant to Section 26150 or 26155 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license if the license is issued to a custodial officer who is an employee of the sheriff as provided in Section 831.5, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s employment pursuant to Section 831.5 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article does not limit the validity of the license to a shorter time period.(d)A license issued pursuant to Section 26170 to a peace officer appointed pursuant to Section 830.6 is valid for any period of time not to exceed four years from the date of the license, except that the license shall be invalid upon the conclusion of the person’s appointment pursuant to Section 830.6 if the four-year period has not otherwise expired or any other condition imposed pursuant to this article does not limit the validity of the license to a shorter time period.SEC. 6. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.